netlify/functions/hello-world/verbs.dix
    <pardef n="la_lqt_krm_wanAxi_IR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqt_A_IR"/><par n="ga_wanAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqt_krm_wanAxi_R">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqt_A_R"/><par n="ga_wanAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqt_krm_wanAxi_s">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqt_A_s"/><par n="ga_wanAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqt_krm_kryAxi_iR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqt_A_iR"/><par n="ga_kryAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqt_krm_kryAxi_IR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqt_A_IR"/><par n="ga_kryAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqt_krm_kryAxi_R">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqt_A_R"/><par n="ga_kryAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqt_krm_kryAxi_s">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqt_A_s"/><par n="ga_kryAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqt_krm_curAxi_iR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqt_A_iR"/><par n="ga_curAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqt_krm_curAxi_iR_ay">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="ma_ay"/><par n="la_lqt_A_iR"/><par n="ga_curAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqt_krm_curAxi_IR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqt_A_IR"/><par n="ga_curAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqt_krm_curAxi_R">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqt_A_R"/><par n="ga_curAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_lqt_krm_curAxi_s">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_lqt_A_s"/><par n="ga_curAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_BvAxi_iR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_iR"/><par n="ga_BvAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_BvAxi_iR_iN">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_iR_iN"/><par n="ga_BvAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_BvAxi_IR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_IR"/><par n="ga_BvAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_BvAxi_IR_iN">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_IR_iN"/><par n="ga_BvAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_BvAxi_s">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_s"/><par n="ga_BvAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_BvAxi_R">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_R"/><par n="ga_BvAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_BvAxi_R_iN">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_R_iN"/><par n="ga_BvAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_axAxi_iR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_iR"/><par n="ga_axAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_axAxi_iR_iN">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_iR_iN"/><par n="ga_axAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_axAxi_IR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_IR"/><par n="ga_axAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_axAxi_IR_iN">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_IR_iN"/><par n="ga_axAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_axAxi_s">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_s"/><par n="ga_axAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_axAxi_R">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_R"/><par n="ga_axAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_axAxi_R_iN">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_R_iN"/><par n="ga_axAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_juhowyAxi_iR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_iR"/><par n="ga_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_juhowyAxi_iR_iN">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_iR_iN"/><par n="ga_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_juhowyAxi_IR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_IR"/><par n="ga_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_juhowyAxi_IR_iN">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_IR_iN"/><par n="ga_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_juhowyAxi_s">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_s"/><par n="ga_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_juhowyAxi_R">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_R"/><par n="ga_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_juhowyAxi_R_iN">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_R_iN"/><par n="ga_juhowyAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_xivAxi_iR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_iR"/><par n="ga_xivAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_xivAxi_iR_iN">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_iR_iN"/><par n="ga_xivAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_xivAxi_IR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_IR"/><par n="ga_xivAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_xivAxi_IR_iN">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_IR_iN"/><par n="ga_xivAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_xivAxi_s">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_s"/><par n="ga_xivAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_xivAxi_R">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_R"/><par n="ga_xivAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_xivAxi_R_iN">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_R_iN"/><par n="ga_xivAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_svAxi_iR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_iR"/><par n="ga_svAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_svAxi_iR_iN">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_iR_iN"/><par n="ga_svAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_svAxi_IR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_IR"/><par n="ga_svAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_svAxi_IR_iN">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_IR_iN"/><par n="ga_svAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_svAxi_s">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_s"/><par n="ga_svAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_svAxi_R">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_R"/><par n="ga_svAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_svAxi_R_iN">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_R_iN"/><par n="ga_svAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_wuxAxi_iR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_iR"/><par n="ga_wuxAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_wuxAxi_iR_iN">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_iR_iN"/><par n="ga_wuxAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_wuxAxi_IR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_IR"/><par n="ga_wuxAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_wuxAxi_IR_iN">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_IR_iN"/><par n="ga_wuxAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_wuxAxi_s">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_s"/><par n="ga_wuxAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_wuxAxi_R">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_R"/><par n="ga_wuxAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_wuxAxi_R_iN">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_R_iN"/><par n="ga_wuxAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_ruXAxi_iR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_iR"/><par n="ga_ruXAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_ruXAxi_iR_iN">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_iR_iN"/><par n="ga_ruXAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="la_ASIrlif_krm_ruXAxi_IR">
        <e><par n="pr_karmaNi"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_A_IR"/><par n="ga_ruXAxi"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="XA1"><i>XA</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_juhowyAxi_s"/></e>
    <e lm="lvI1"><i>lv</i><par n="mr_I_e"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqt_krm_kryAxi_R"/></e>
    <e lm="kRu1"><i>kR</i><par n="mr_u_av"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_axAxi_iR_iN"/></e>
    <e lm="brU1"><p><l>vak</l><r>brU</r></p><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_axAxi_R_iN"/></e>
    <e lm="RU2"><par n="mr_R_s"/><par n="mr_U_o"/><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_xivAxi_R_iN"/></e>
    <e lm="XU1"><i>X</i><par n="mr_U_Av"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_svAxi_iR_iN"/></e>
    <e lm="XU1"><i>X</i><par n="mr_U_o"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_svAxi_R_iN"/></e>
    <e lm="kq1"><i>kq</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_BvAxi_R_iN"/></e>
    <e lm="Gq2"><i>Gq</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_juhowyAxi_R_iN"/></e>
    <e lm="q2"><par n="mr_q_ar"/><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_juhowyAxi_iR_iN"/></e>
    <e lm="vQ1"><i>v</i><par n="mr_Q_ar"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqt_krm_kryAxi_iR"/></e>
    <e lm="BQ1"><i>B</i><par n="mr_Q_ar"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqt_krm_kryAxi_IR"/></e>
    <e lm="vq2"><i>v</i><par n="mr_q_ar"/><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lqt_krm_kryAxi_IR"/></e>
    <e lm="mIm1"><i>mIm</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_BvAxi_iR"/></e>
    <e lm="galh1"><i>galh</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_BvAxi_iR_iN"/></e>
    <e lm="Nam1"><par n="mr_N_n"/><i>a</i><par n="mr_m_M"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_BvAxi_s"/></e>
    <e lm="pac1"><i>pa</i><par n="mr_c_k"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_BvAxi_R"/></e>
    <e lm="vac1"><i>va</i><par n="mr_c_k"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_axAxi_R"/></e>
    <e lm="as2"><p><l>Bav</l><r>as</r></p><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_axAxi_iR"/></e>
    <e lm="Rvap1"><par n="mr_R_s"/><i>vap</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_axAxi_s"/></e>
    <e lm="viR2"><i>vi</i><par n="mr_R_k"/><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_juhowyAxi_R"/></e>
    <e lm="jan1"><i>jan</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_juhowyAxi_iR"/></e>
    <e lm="XUr1"><i>XUr</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_xivAxi_iR_iN"/></e>
    <e lm="SliR2"><i>Sl</i><par n="mr_i_e"/><par n="mr_R_k"/><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_xivAxi_R"/></e>
    <e lm="ruR2"><i>r</i><par n="mr_u_o"/><i>R</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_xivAxi_iR"/></e>
    <e lm="klix2"><i>kli</i><par n="mr_x_w"/><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_xivAxi_s"/></e>
    <e lm="sAX1"><i>sA</i><par n="mr_X_w"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_svAxi_s"/></e>
    <e lm="aS1"><i>a</i><par n="mr_S_k"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_svAxi_R"/></e>
    <e lm="qX2"><par n="mr_q_ar"/><i>X</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_svAxi_iR"/></e>
    <e lm="vqh3"><i>v</i><par n="mr_q_ar"/><i>h</i><par n="var_3"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_wuxAxi_iR_iN"/></e>
    <e lm="bqh3"><i>b</i><par n="mr_q_ar"/><par n="mr_h_k"/><par n="var_3"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_wuxAxi_R_iN"/></e>
    <e lm="kuc2"><i>kuc</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_wuxAxi_iR"/></e>
    <e lm="mqS1"><i>m</i><par n="mr_q_ar"/><par n="mr_S_k"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_wuxAxi_R"/></e>
    <e lm="vix3"><i>vi</i><par n="mr_x_w"/><par n="var_3"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_wuxAxi_s"/></e>
    <e lm="wqh4"><i>w</i><par n="mr_q_ar"/><i>h</i><par n="var_4"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_ruXAxi_iR_iN"/></e>
    <e lm="wanj1"><p><l>waFj</l><r>wanj</r></p><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_ASIrlif_krm_ruXAxi_iR"/></e>
    <e lm="banX1"><par n="mr_b_B"/><i>an</i><par n="mr_X_w"/><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqt_krm_kryAxi_s"/></e>
    <e lm="granW1"><i>granW</i><par n="var_1"/><par n="la_lqt_krm_kryAxi_iR"/></e>
    <e lm="viR3"><i>v</i><par n="mr_i_e"/><par n="mr_R_k"/><par n="var_3"/><par n="la_lqt_krm_kryAxi_R"/></e>
    <e lm="was2"><i>wa</i><par n="ma_M"/><i>s</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lqt_krm_curAxi_iR_ay"/></e>
    <e lm="BUR2"><i>BUR</i><par n="var_2"/><par n="la_lqt_krm_curAxi_iR"/></e>
